Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1705
Felonies; recognizance ordered by court; authority.

When any person has been indicted for a felony and the person so indicted has not been arrested or recognized to appear before the court, the court may make an entry of the cause upon the record and may order the amount in which the party indicted may be recognized for his or her appearance by any officer charged with the duty of arresting him or her.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 430, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9074;

C.S.1922, § 10098;

C.S.1929, § 29-1705;

R.S.1943, § 29-1705;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 54.

Recognizance, taken before unauthorized person, or when taking thereof is unauthorized, is void. Dickenson v. State, 20 Neb. 72, 29 N.W. 184 (1886).